District of Columbia statutes.
5-1501.14

Functions of the Stakeholder Council.

The Stakeholder Council shall:

(1)

Identify issues or concerns regarding:

(A)

The Department’s delivery of forensic science services to agencies, including the timeliness of service; and

(B)

The general effectiveness of the Department in the furtherance of its agency mission; and

(2)

Advise the Mayor and the Council, as it considers necessary, on matters relating to the Department or forensic science.

Aug. 17, 2011, D.C. Law 19-18, § 15, 58 DCR 5403